California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The election shall be held not less than 60 days nor more than 90 days from the date of the adoption of the resolution prescribed by Section 50037.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50039.

The election shall be called by publishing notice calling the election pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code not less than 20 days before the election. The notice need only specify the time and place of the election, the hours during which the polls will be open, the purpose of the election, and the description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the board of supervisors.

No notice of the election other than the notice prescribed by this section need be given except that
 the county elections official shall mail notice of the polling place and the purpose of the election to each qualified elector of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50040.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following: Shall the “Stockton Metropolitan Transit District” be created and established?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50041.

No person shall be entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the territory included in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50042.

The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election, and be consolidated therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50043.

The board of supervisors shall meet on the Tuesday next succeeding the day of the election and canvass the returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50044.

The board of supervisors shall make all provisions for the holding of the election throughout the entire district as proposed, and shall pay the cost thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50045.

If a special election is held exclusively on the proposition of organizing the district, the expenditure therefor shall be reimbursed to the county by means of a tax on all the taxable property within the territory which was proposed to be included in the district, and this tax shall be added to the next county tax bills by the proper official of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Establishment of the District [50050. - 50050.]

50050.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote in favor of the creation and establishment of the district, the board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the result of the election to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, from and after which the establishment of the district shall be deemed complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contest of Incorporation [50055. - 50055.]

50055.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of the election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of the district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of incorporation is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of filing the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State, otherwise the incorporation and the legal existence of the district shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of District [50060. - 50110.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [50060. - 50064.]

50060.

The government of the district shall be vested in a board of five directors. Two of the directors shall be appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Joaquin. Two of the directors shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Stockton. The board of supervisors, together with five members of the city council appointed by the mayor, shall constitute a board of election which, by a majority vote, shall appoint the fifth director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 995, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

50061.

These appointments shall be made within 30 days after the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50062.

A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the body which appointed the director whose office is vacated and the new appointee shall hold his office for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50063.

Each director shall, within 10 days after his appointment and before entering upon the discharge of his duties of his office, take and subscribe to an oath in the form set forth in Section 3 of Article XX of the Constitution of California before an officer authorized by law to administer oaths. The oaths shall be filed in the office of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50064.

A person shall not be appointed to or be a member of the board unless he is a resident of the district and has resided within the district at least one year immediately prior to his appointment to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Terms of Office [50067. - 50067.]

50067.

The term of office of each director is four years from the time of his appointment, except that the chairman first appointed shall hold office for two years, and the remaining directors first appointed to the board shall classify themselves by lot, so that the two appointed by the board of supervisors shall hold office for one and three years and the two appointed by the city council shall hold office for two and four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties of Directors [50070. - 50080.]

50070.

The board shall annually, in January, select one of its members as chairperson to serve at the pleasure of the board. The chairperson shall preside at all meetings of the board and shall vote on the propositions passed upon by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 995, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

50071.

The first meeting of the board shall be held within 10 days of the appointment of its chairman. The board may make its own rules of procedure and determine the place and time of its meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50072.

The board shall select one of its members vice chairman, who shall preside in the absence of its chairman. The board shall provide for and select such officers as it deems necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50073.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this part shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50074.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50075.

The board may either operate the transit system itself, or it may contract with the City of Stockton, or with any other public or private agency, to operate the transit system for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50075.5.

All new intercity, interregional, and rural services provided outside the Stockton Metropolitan Area shall be subject to open competitive bidding at least once every five years. For the bidding, the district may be one of the bidders. The district shall cause notice inviting bids to be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within San Joaquin County, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are to be received. The contract for service shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The board may reject any and all
 bids and may readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

50076.

The board may adopt a personnel system for the purpose of recruiting and maintaining an effective working force with good morale. The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district and shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created. The board may by resolution abolish any such position. Except as otherwise provided, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50077.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or services which cannot satisfactorily be performed by the regular employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50078.

The board shall have an annual audit made of all books and accounts of the district by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50079.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50080.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meetings and Legislation [50085. - 50090.]

50085.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in a manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50086.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50087.

The board shall adopt rules for its proceedings and may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each member shall receive for each attendance at the meetings of the board and committees the sum of one hundred dollars ($100), but not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in a calendar month, and shall be allowed such necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in the performance of duties authorized by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   (AB 1853)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

50088.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. No ordinance shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within three days thereafter, nor at any time other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting. No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50089.

All ordinances shall be published after passage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50090.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows:

“Be it enacted by the board of directors of San Joaquin Regional Transit District:” All ordinances shall be signed by the chairperson of the board or the vice chairperson and attested by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 704, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Officers [50095. - 50110.]

50095.

The board shall appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district, and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50096.

All other things being equal, the board shall appoint as general manager, a person who has had experience in the construction or management of transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50097.

The general manager need not be a resident of this State at the time of his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50098.

The general manager may be removed by the board upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the board. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he demands it, be given a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal, but pending and during such hearing the board may suspend him from office. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by
 a like vote and after a like opportunity to be heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary, if approved by a majority of the membership of the board, is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50099.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Section 50098, until such time as the district has operated, controlled, or used facilities or parts of facilities for providing the inhabitants within the boundaries of the district with transit services for a period of six months, the board may, but is not required to, appoint a general manager. A general manager appointed during such time holds office at the pleasure of the majority of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50100.

The board shall appoint a secretary and an attorney, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50101.

The attorney shall be admitted to practice law in the Supreme Court of the State, and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of his profession for not less than three years next preceding his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50102.

The board may consolidate any of the district offices in one person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50103.

The oath of all appointive officers of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50104.

Each appointive officer shall give such bond and in such amount as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50105.

Subject to the control of the board, the powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district.

(b) To have full charge of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(c) To see that all ordinances of the district are enforced.

(d) To administer the personnel system adopted by the board and
 except for officers appointed by the board to appoint, discipline or remove all officers and employees subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board.

(e) To attend all meetings of the board and submit a general report of the affairs of the district.

(f) To keep the board advised as to the needs of the district.

(g) To prepare or cause to be prepared all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of the district.

(h) To devote his entire time to the business of the district.

(i) To perform such other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50106.

The general manager shall within 90 days from the end of each fiscal year cause to be published a financial report showing the result of operations for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof. The publication shall be made in the manner provided in this part for the publication of ordinances and notices generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50107.

The attorney shall take charge of all suits and other legal matters to which the district is a party or in which it is legally interested. He shall give his advice or opinion in writing whenever required by the board. He shall be the legal adviser of the general manager and other district officers and shall prepare or approve the forms of all ordinances, resolutions, contracts, bonds, and other legal documents connected with the business of the district. He shall perform such other and additional services as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50108.

The general manager shall cause to be installed and maintained a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district. All warrants for the payment of demands against the district shall be paid in accordance with such rules as the board may establish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50109.

The general manager shall provide for the custody of the funds of the district and the keeping of accounts of all receipts and disbursements. Payments shall be made only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the chairman or vice chairman of the board, or other person authorized by the board so to do, and by the general manager or secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50110.

With the consent of the board, the general manager may:

(a) Authorize the trust department of any state or national bank in this State, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this State, to receive as his agent deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(b) Place and maintain for safekeeping as a trust deposit with the trust department of any state or national banks in this State, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this State, any securities owned by the district.

The
 bank or trust company selected shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The general manager shall take from the trust department or trust company a receipt for the securities, and neither the general manager nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the trust department or trust company by the general manager. Any trust department or trust company to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depository for the general manager, shall make such disposition of the securities as the general manager directs and is responsible only for strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the general manager. All such securities are at all times subject to the order of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Labor Provisions [50120. - 50126.]

50120.

(a) If a majority of the employees employed by a transit district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, then the board, after determining pursuant to Section 50121 that the labor organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall bargain with the accredited representative of those employees. Both parties shall
 bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, and grievance procedures.

(b) (1) If a dispute arises over the terms of a written contract governing wages, salaries, hours, or working conditions that is not resolved by negotiations conducted in good faith between the board and the representatives of the employees, then the board and the representatives of the employees shall submit the dispute to an arbitration board. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final.

(2) (A) The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the transit board, two representatives of the labor organization, and a fifth member to be agreed upon by the representatives of the transit board and labor
 organization.

(B) If the representatives of the transit board and labor organization are unable to agree on the fifth member, then the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list supplied by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. After the labor organization and the transit district have stricken four names, the name remaining shall be designated as the arbitrator.

(C) The transit board and the labor organization shall each pay one-half of the cost of the impartial arbitrator.

(c) A contract or agreement shall not be
 made with any labor organization, association, group, or individual that denies membership on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence.

(d) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 125.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

50121.

If there is a question whether a labor organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the State Conciliation Service for disposition. The State Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing and may, by decision, establish the boundaries of any collective bargaining unit and provide for an election to determine the question of representation. Provided, however, any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the ground that a new substantial question of representation
 within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50122.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by said utility for at least seventy-five (75) days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination and shall be governed thereafter by the personnel system adopted by the board, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50123.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system.

Whenever any such facilities are acquired by the district, the board shall consider and take into account the outstanding obligations and liabilities of the publicly or privately owned public utility by reason of such pension plan and shall negotiate an allowance in the
 purchase price of such utility for the assumption of such obligations and liabilities when acquiring the facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50124.

The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in Section 50123 and the benefits which are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50125.

All persons receiving pension benefits from such acquired public utility and all persons entitled to pension benefits under the pension plan of such acquired public utility may become members or receive pensions under the retirement system established by the district by mutual agreement of such persons and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50126.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the Government Code, the board may authorize payment of any or all of the premiums on any group life, accident and health insurance, health and welfare plan, or pension or retirement plan, on officers or employees of a district. Upon authorization by its employees, a district may make deductions from the wages and salaries of its employees:

(a) Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments. 

(b) For the
 payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare, pension, or retirement plan.

(c) For any purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [50130. - 50156.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [50130. - 50135.]

50130.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers and employees of the district and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits or any of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50131.

The district may maintain its own retirement fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance, or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50132.

Before establishing any retirement system the board shall secure a report from a qualified actuary, which shall show the cost of the benefits provided by the system, and the prospective assets and liabilities of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50133.

The board may adopt all ordinances and resolutions and perform all acts necessary or convenient to the initiation, maintenance, and administration of the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50134.

Nothing in this chapter prevents a district from participating in and making all or part of its employees members of the State Employees’ Retirement System by contract entered into between the district and the board of administration of the system under the State Employees’ Retirement Law or from participating in the Federal Social Security Act pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 22000), Division 5, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the district may perform all acts necessary or convenient for such participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50135.

The board may classify and determine the officers and employees who shall be included as members in the retirement system and may change the classification from time to time. Membership of all officers and employees so classified and included in the retirement system is compulsory. The retirement system shall not apply to members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits and Contributions [50140. - 50146.]

50140.

The board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the officers and employees of the district or their beneficiaries shall be entitled to benefits and the amounts thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50141.

The retirement allowance may be predicated in part upon service rendered the district by a member prior to the establishment of the retirement system, which service is known as “prior service.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50142.

The board shall provide that both the district and the members shall contribute to the retirement system. The rate of contribution by an officer or employee of the district becoming a member of the retirement system shall be so fixed as to provide, with accumulated interest and based on tables and assumptions adopted by the board, substantially one-half the value of any retirement allowance granted for service, exclusive of any credits allowed for prior service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50143.

All members of the retirement system shall contribute in the manner and amount fixed by the board and such contributions may be collected by deducting the amounts thereof from the salary, wages, or compensation due such members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50144.

Liabilities accruing under the retirement system because of benefits other than such as are the equivalent of contributions by the members, with accumulated interests, shall be met by contributions by the district. Prior service or other liabilities of the district may be met by annual appropriations instead of by one appropriation for the total of the liabilities; but until the present value of regular contributions for current service, together with assets then available, equals the present value of all allowances and benefits granted or to be granted under the system, the appropriation for any one year when added to any unused balance of any previous appropriations for
 such purpose shall not be less than the amount disbursed during that year on account of prior service or other liabilities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50145.

If any member withdraws from the retirement system prior to retirement the total amount contributed by him with such interest as may be credited thereto shall be returned to him; provided, however, that the board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which a member, whose district service is terminated except by death or retirement, may elect to leave his contributions and interest thereon in the retirement fund, and the terms and conditions upon which a retirement allowance may be made to him after such termination based upon his contributions prior to such termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50146.

All money received by any person as an annuity, pension, retirement allowance, disability payment, or death benefit from the retirement system, and all contributions and interest thereon returned to any member of the retirement system, whether in the actual possession of such person or deposited, loaned, or invested by him, is exempt from execution or any other process except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure and is unassignable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 167.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Board [50150. - 50153.]

50150.

The board shall create a retirement board of not more than five members, at least two members of which shall be the elected representatives of the employees, to administer the retirement system, and shall define its powers and duties and the tenure of the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50151.

All members of the retirement board shall serve without pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50152.

The retirement board shall determine the eligibility of officers, employees, and their dependents to participation in the system and shall be the sole authority and judge under such ordinances as may be adopted by the board as to the conditions under which persons may be admitted to and continue to receive benefits of any sort under the retirement system, and may modify allowances for service and disability. The determination of the retirement board shall be final and conclusive and shall not be modified or set aside except for fraud or abuse of discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50153.

If the district maintains its own retirement fund the retirement board shall have exclusive control of the administration, investment, and disbursement of such fund. Investment of the fund shall be subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by the laws of this State upon savings banks in the making of investments by savings banks, and cash may be deposited in any licensed national bank or banks in this State or in any bank, banks, or corporations authorized or licensed to do a banking business and organized under the laws of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigation and Penalties [50155. - 50156.]

50155.

At least once in each four-year period after the establishment of the retirement system the board shall cause to be made an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement fund, and upon the basis of such investigation and valuation shall make such revision or change of the rates of contribution, the periods and conditions of service, and amounts of retirement allowances as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.

Except as herein provided, no member of the board or of the retirement board, nor any member of the retirement system or employee of the district, shall have any interest direct or indirect in the making of any investment or in the gains or profits accruing therefrom, and no such person, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent or partner of others, shall borrow any of its funds, nor shall any such person in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the retirement board, nor shall such a person become an endorser or surety as to, or in any manner an obligor for investments of the retirement
 fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [50160. - 50220.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [50160. - 50162.]

50160.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50161.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

50162.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district, in exercising such power shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, cables, or poles of any public utility or public district which is required to be moved to a new location.

No action in eminent domain to acquire property within any incorporated city or any county shall be commenced unless the legislative body of
 the affected city or county has consented to such acquisition by resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [50165. - 50166.]

50165.
